Indiana, session 2026, SB83.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-10-54, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 54. (a) As used in this section, "designating
body" means the fiscal body of:
(1) a county that does not contain a consolidated city; or
(2) a municipality.
(b) As used in this section, "eligible business" means an entity that
meets the following requirements:
(1) The entity is engaged in a business that:
(A) operates; or
(B) leases qualified property for use in;
one (1) or more facilities.
(2) The entity's qualified property is located at a facility in
Indiana.
(3) The entity, the lessor of qualified property (if the entity is a
lessee), and all lessees of qualified property invest in the
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


aggregate at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in
real and personal property at one (1) or more facilities in Indiana
after January 1, 2026.
(4) The average wage of employees who are located in the county
or municipality and engaged in the operation of the facility is at
least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the county
average wage for the county in which the facility operates.
(c) As used in this section, "facility" has the meaning set forth in
IC 6-2.5-15-5.
(d) As used in this section, "fiscal body" has the meaning set forth
in IC 36-1-2-6.
(e) As used in this section, "municipality" has the meaning set forth
in IC 36-1-2-11.
(f) As used in this section, "qualified property" means quantum safe
fiber network equipment purchased after January 1, 2026, and any
additions to or replacements to of such property.
(g) As used in this section, "quantum safe fiber network equipment"
has the meaning set forth in IC 6-2.5-15-13.3. means optical gear,
transmission equipment, fiber, computer equipment, software, or
any other equipment or software of any type purchased or leased
for the processing, storage, retrieval, communication, or
transmission of data over a quantum safe fiber network that is
preapproved by the Indiana economic development corporation,
adheres to all compliance standards of the federal Trade
Agreements Act of 1979 (Public Law 96-39, 93 Stat. 144, as
amended) throughout the entire network, including all access
physical intermediate access points (nodes), has a manufacturing
origin point in North America, uses only coherent optics with FIPS
140-3 certified encryption technology, and supports quantum safe
algorithms that are compliant with National Institute of Standards
and Technology of the United States Department of Commerce
requirements, including post-quantum cryptography and other
post quantum resistant cryptography implementations. The term
includes the following:
(1) Installed quantum-safe optical gear and federal Trade
Agreements Act of 1979 (Public Law 96-39, 93 Stat. 144, as
amended) compliant American-made fiber optic cable.
(2) Servers, routers, connections, monitoring and security
systems, and other enabling machinery, equipment, and
hardware, regardless of whether the property is affixed to or
incorporated into real property.
(3) Equipment used in the operation of computer equipment
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


or software or for the benefit of a quantum computing
research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure
network, including component parts, installations,
refreshments, replacements, and upgrades, regardless of
whether the property is affixed to or incorporated into real
property.
(4) All equipment necessary for the transformation,
generation, distribution, or management of electricity that is
required to operate advanced computer or quantum
computer server equipment, including substations,
generators, uninterruptible energy equipment, supplies,
conduit, fuel piping and storage, cabling, duct banks, switches,
switchboards, batteries, testing equipment, and backup
generators.
(5) All equipment necessary to cool and maintain a controlled
environment for the operation of the computer servers and
other components of a quantum fiber network, including
chillers, mechanical equipment, refrigerant piping, fuel piping
and storage, adiabatic and free cooling systems, cooling
towers, water softeners, air handling units, indoor direct
exchange units, fans, ducting, and filters.
(6) All water conservation systems, including facilities or
mechanisms that are designed to collect, conserve, and reuse
water required for the infrastructure of a quantum fiber
network.
(7) All computer server equipment, chassis, networking
equipment, switches, racks, fiber optic and copper cabling,
trays, and conduit required for a quantum fiber network.
(8) All conduit, ducting, and fiber optic and copper cabling
required for a quantum fiber network.
(9) All monitoring equipment and security systems.
(10) All software required for the operation, development,
and maintenance of a quantum fiber network.
(11) All intangible rights to use conduit or existing fibers
directly related to a quantum fiber network.
(12) All tangible and intangible personal property that is
required for operation of each intermediate access point
(node) connected to a quantum fiber network, excluding
property used in the administration of the facility.
(13) Other tangible and intangible personal property that is
essential to the operations of a quantum fiber network,
excluding property used in the administration of the facility.
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


(14) All electricity used by qualified quantum fiber network
equipment, excluding electricity used in the administration of
the facility.
(h) A designating body may enter into an agreement with an eligible
business to grant the eligible business a property tax exemption. In the
case of a county, the exemption applies only to qualified property that
is located in unincorporated territory of the county. In the case of a
municipality, the exemption applies only to qualified property that is
located in the municipality. The property tax exemption applies to the
qualified property only if the designating body and the eligible business
enter into an agreement concerning the property tax exemption. The
agreement must specify the duration of the property tax exemption. The
agreement may specify that if the ownership of qualified property is
transferred by an eligible business, the transferee is entitled to the
property tax exemption on the same terms as the transferor. If a
designating body enters into an agreement with an eligible business,
the qualified property owned by the eligible business is exempt from
property taxation as provided in the resolution and the agreement.
(i) If a designating body enters into an agreement under subsection
(h) to provide a property tax exemption, the property tax exemption
continues for the period specified in the agreement.
SECTION 2. IC 6-2.5-5-59.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 59.1. (a) This section applies
to a transaction involving the sale of utility service by a utility
regardless of whether the utility is under the jurisdiction of the
Indiana utility regulatory commission for the approval of rates and
charges.
(b) As used in this section, "customer" refers to a customer of
any class, including:
(1) a residential customer;
(2) a commercial customer; or
(3) an industrial customer;
that has agreed to pay for utility service provided by a utility.
(c) As used in this section, "utility" means a person, however
organized, that provides utility service to a customer.
(d) As used in this section, "utility service" means:
(1) electric;
(2) natural gas;
(3) water; or
(4) wastewater;
service that is provided at retail to a customer in Indiana.
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


(e) A transaction involving the sale of utility service, as reflected
in the total amount billed by a utility in a customer bill that is
issued after December 31, 2026, is exempt from the state gross
retail tax. For purposes of this subsection, the total amount billed
by a utility in a customer bill includes any:
(1) fixed charges;
(2) consumption based charges;
(3) charges in connection with a periodic rate adjustment
mechanism;
(4) taxes other than the state gross retail tax;
(5) program charges;
(6) account management or billing fees; and
(7) other applicable charges or fees;
that make up the total amount owed for the billing cycle,
regardless of whether the particular charge or fee appears as a
separate line item, or is otherwise identified, on the customer bill.
(f) The exemption provided by subsection (e) applies to a
customer bill issued by a utility after December 31, 2026,
regardless of whether the bill includes any fees or charges for
utility service provided to the customer before January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. IC 6-2.5-15-0.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter, "advanced computing"
means a computational method or technology, including hardware,
software, and quantum safe fiber network equipment, that is designed,
engineered, and installed to solve large, complex problems or process
large data sets, including quantum computing, artificial intelligence,
edge computing, and computational sets that use entanglement nodes
that are beyond the capability of classical digital computational
computing.
SECTION 4. IC 6-2.5-15-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 71, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "eligible costs"
means expenditures made
(1) after December 31, 2018, for the development, acquisition,
construction, and operation of a facility to be used as a qualified
data center, including costs of land, buildings, site improvements,
modular data centers, computer data center equipment acquisition
and permitting, lease payments, site characterization and
assessment, engineering, and design used directly and exclusively
in a qualified data center. or
(2) after January 1, 2026, for the development, acquisition,
construction, and operation of a facility to be used as part of a
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


quantum computing research, advanced computing, and defense
infrastructure network that is connected by quantum safe fiber
network equipment and used for quantum research or advanced
computing at, or related to, a qualified military installation in
Indiana or the I-Light network, including costs of all quantum safe
fiber network equipment, rights-of-way, conduit, other required
access, land, buildings, site improvements, modular data centers,
computer data center equipment acquisition and permitting, lease
payments, site characterization and assessment, engineering, and
design used directly and exclusively as part of a quantum
computing research, advanced computing, and defense
infrastructure network.
SECTION 5. IC 6-2.5-15-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "facility" means
one (1) or more tracts of land in Indiana and
(1) a structure or building contained on the land used specifically
for:
(A) quantum research or commercialization;
(B) quantum safe fiber network equipment;
(C) advanced computing;
(D) quantum research or advanced computing for the defense
industry;
(E) the qualified equipment that is placed in the structure or
building; or
(F) one (1) or more quantum safe fiber networks;
including any structures and personal property contained on the
land that is required to operate a quantum safe fiber network; and
(2) any structures and personal property contained on the land for
the operation of a data center
in either a single location or multiple distributed locations.
SECTION 6. IC 6-2.5-15-5.7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 5.7. As used in this chapter, "I-Light" has the
meaning set forth in IC 8-1-32.7-3.
SECTION 7. IC 6-2.5-15-6.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 6.5. As used in this chapter, "interest in a quantum
computing research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure
network" means an entity that is the owner of, the operator of, or a
qualified colocation tenant in, any element of a quantum safe fiber
network or a quantum computing, advanced computing, and defense
infrastructure network.
(b) The term includes an interest in a portion of a quantum
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


computing research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure
network.
SECTION 8. IC 6-2.5-15-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2025,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "operator" means
an entity, other than an owner or a qualified colocation tenant,
operating a data center or a quantum computing research, advanced
computing, and defense infrastructure network pursuant to a lease or
other contract with the owner or a lessor. The term includes a licensed
property management company, a property lessor, or any other
individual or entity responsible for the control, oversight, or
maintenance of a facility. The term also includes an affiliate of an
operator.
SECTION 9. IC 6-2.5-15-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2025,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 9. As used in this chapter, "qualified
colocation tenant" means an entity that contracts with the owner or
operator of a
(1) qualified data center or
(2) quantum computing, advanced computing, and defense
infrastructure network;
that is certified under this chapter to use or occupy all or part of the
data center or quantum computing, advanced computing, and defense
infrastructure network for a period of two (2) or more years.
SECTION 10. IC 6-2.5-15-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2025,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11. As used in this chapter, "qualified
equipment" means data center equipment or quantum computing
research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure network
equipment in located at a qualified data center. or a quantum
computing research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure
network.
SECTION 11. IC 6-2.5-15-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2025,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 13. As used in this chapter, "qualified
investment" means, with respect to a
(1) qualified data center, the aggregate nonduplicative eligible
data center costs expended by any entity with an interest in the
qualified data center. or
(2) quantum computing research, advanced computing, and
defense infrastructure network, the aggregate nonduplicative
eligible costs expended by any entity with an interest in the
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


quantum computing research, advanced computing, and defense
infrastructure network.
SECTION 12. IC 6-2.5-15-13.2 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]. Sec. 13.2. As used in this chapter, "quantum safe
fiber network" means a fiber network that includes each of the
following attributes:
(1) A deployed fiber infrastructure comprised of:
(A) standard single mode optical fibers (G.652.D) that are
compliant with the federal Trade Agreements Act of 1979
(Public Law 96-39, 93 Stat. 144, as amended);
(B) flexgrid reconfigurable photonic layer; and
(C) only coherent optical transponders with FIPS 140-3
certified L1 encryption (OTNsec) with support for external key
from quantum key distribution servers that are compliant with
the federal Trade Agreements Act of 1979 (Public Law 96-39,
93 Stat. 144, as amended);
on electronics and glass.
(2) A fiber infrastructure that is connected to:
(A) a military installation of the United States of America;
(B) the Indiana National Guard;
(C) another military outlet or I-Light; or
(D) an institution of higher learning conducting quantum
computing research or advanced computing research.
(3) A network engineered with physical intermediate access
points (nodes) not more than sixty (60) miles apart.
(4) A network with physical intermediate access points (nodes)
equipped with physical access control and remote monitoring.
(5) A network with quantum key distribution (QKD) servers
deployed on every fiber span.
(6) A network that is not used for residential broadband and
limited in use to less fifteen percent (15%) for commercial
broadband (ISP) applications.
(7) A network that complies with the federal Trade Agreements
Act of 1979 (Public Law 96-39, 93 Stat. 144) as amended.
SECTION 13. IC 6-2.5-15-13.3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]. Sec. 13.3. (a) As used in this chapter, "quantum
safe fiber network equipment" means optical gear, transmission
equipment, fiber, computer equipment, software, or any other
equipment or software of any type purchased or leased for the
processing, storage, retrieval, communication, or transmission of data
over a quantum safe fiber network that:
(1) is preapproved by the corporation;
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


(2) adheres to all compliance standards of the federal Trade
Agreements Act of 1979 (Public Law 96-39, 93 Stat. 144, as
amended) throughout the entire network, including all access
physical intermediate access points (nodes);
(3) has a manufacturing origin point in North America;
(4) uses only coherent optics with FIPS 140-3 certified encryption
technology; and
(5) supports quantum safe algorithms that are compliant with
National Institute of Standards and Technology of the United
States Department of Commerce requirements, including
post-quantum cryptography and other post quantum resistant
cryptography implementations.
(b) The term includes the following:
(1) Installed quantum-safe optical gear and federal Trade
Agreements Act of 1979 (Public Law 96-39, 93 Stat. 144, as
amended) compliant American-made fiber optic cable.
(2) Servers, routers, connections, monitoring and security
systems, and other enabling machinery, equipment, and hardware,
regardless of whether the property is affixed to or incorporated
into real property.
(3) Equipment used in the operation of computer equipment or
software or for the benefit of a quantum computing research,
advanced computing, and defense infrastructure network,
including component parts, installations, refreshments,
replacements, and upgrades, regardless of whether the property is
affixed to or incorporated into real property.
(4) All equipment necessary for the transformation, generation,
distribution, or management of electricity that is required to
operate advanced computer or quantum computer server
equipment, including substations, generators, uninterruptible
energy equipment, supplies, conduit, fuel piping and storage,
cabling, duct banks, switches, switchboards, batteries, testing
equipment, and backup generators.
(5) All equipment necessary to cool and maintain a controlled
environment for the operation of the computer servers and other
components of a quantum fiber network, including chillers,
mechanical equipment, refrigerant piping, fuel piping and storage,
adiabatic and free cooling systems, cooling towers, water
softeners, air handling units, indoor direct exchange units, fans,
ducting, and filters.
(6) All water conservation systems, including facilities or
mechanisms that are designed to collect, conserve, and reuse
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


water required for the infrastructure of a quantum fiber network.
(7) All computer server equipment, chassis, networking
equipment, switches, racks, fiber optic and copper cabling, trays,
and conduit required for a quantum fiber network.
(8) All conduit, ducting, and fiber optic and copper cabling
required for a quantum fiber network.
(9) All monitoring equipment and security systems.
(10) All software required for the operation, development, and
maintenance of a quantum fiber network.
(11) All intangible rights to use conduit or existing fibers directly
related to a quantum fiber network.
(12) All tangible and intangible personal property that is required
for operation of each intermediate access point (node) connected
to a quantum fiber network, excluding property used in the
administration of the facility.
(13) Other tangible and intangible personal property that is
essential to the operations of a quantum fiber network, excluding
property used in the administration of the facility.
(14) All electricity used by qualified quantum fiber network
equipment, excluding electricity used in the administration of the
facility.
SECTION 14. IC 6-2.5-15-13.4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]. Sec. 13.4. As used in this chapter, "quantum
computing research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure
network" means the quantum safe fiber network between two (2) or
more facilities using qualified equipment to create and connect
qualified facilities to a quantum safe fiber network that create a
minimum qualified investment of at least fifty million dollars
($50,000,000) on or before the fifth anniversary of the issuance of the
specific transaction award certificate by the corporation. The term
includes the land, buildings, site improvements, permitting, lease
payments, site characterization and assessment, engineering and
design, quantum safe fiber network equipment, rights-of-way, and any
other required access, used directly to be a part of:
(1) a qualified advanced computing or a qualified quantum
computing research initiative within Indiana;
(2) the deployment or expansion of advanced computing, within
Indiana;
(3) the expansion of the defense industry within Indiana; or
(4) the quantum computing research, advanced computing and
defense infrastructure network connected to and used for:
(A) quantum research (including computing, communication,
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


and networking);
(B) advanced computing; or
(C) defense infrastructure network;
at or related to the federal or state of Indiana military installations,
research universities, I-Light, or any other Department of Defense
or Indiana National Guard installation within Indiana.
SECTION 15. IC 6-2.5-15-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2025,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 14. (a) A qualified data center user or a
quantum computing research, advanced computing, and defense
infrastructure network operator that holds an interest in a qualified data
center or an interest in a quantum computing research, advanced
computing, and defense infrastructure network may apply to the
corporation for a specific transaction award certificate to make
purchases, other than the purchase of utilities described in IC 6-2.5-4-5,
that are exempt under this chapter. The request must be on a form
prescribed by the corporation.
(b) The corporation has exclusive authority over issues related to
issuing a specific transaction award certificate.
(c) If the corporation issues a specific transaction award certificate
under this chapter, the certificate must state that the facility is a
qualified data center. or a quantum computing research, advanced
computing, and defense infrastructure network, as applicable.
(d) A specific transaction award certificate issued by the corporation
shall expire not later than:
(1) twenty-five (25) years after the date of issuance; or
(2) in the case of a qualified data center user, fifty (50) years after
the date of issuance if the qualified investment is seven hundred
fifty million dollars ($750,000,000) or greater. or
(3) in the case of a quantum computing research, advanced
computing, and defense infrastructure network operator, fifty (50)
years after the date of issuance if the qualified investment is fifty
million dollars ($50,000,000) or greater within three (3) years of
the issuance of the transaction award certificate.
SECTION 16. IC 6-2.5-15-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2025,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 15. The following apply if the corporation
approves an application for a specific transaction award certificate:
(1) The corporation shall require the qualified data center user or
quantum computing research, advanced computing, and defense
infrastructure network operator, as applicable, to enter into an
agreement with the corporation as a condition of receiving a
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


specific transaction award certificate under this chapter.
(2) The agreement with the corporation must include:
(A) a detailed description of the project that is the subject of
the agreement; that includes documentation of compliance
with the requirement that the investment be specific to
infrastructure for the Indiana defense industry or quantum
computing research or advanced computing;
(B) the duration of the specific transaction award certificate
and the first taxable year for which the award provided by this
chapter may be used; and
(C) a requirement that the qualified data center user or
quantum computing research, advanced computing, and
defense infrastructure network operator, as applicable,
annually report to the corporation on the amount of taxes that
were not paid by the qualified data center user or quantum
computing research, advanced computing, and defense
infrastructure network operator in connection with the
purchase of data center equipment. or quantum computing
research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure
network equipment, as applicable.
SECTION 17. IC 6-2.5-15-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2025,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 16. The sale of qualified data center or
quantum computing research, advanced computing, and defense
infrastructure network equipment is exempt from the state gross retail
tax if the qualified data center equipment: or quantum computing
research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure network
equipment, as applicable:
(1) is sold to a qualified data center user or a quantum computing
research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure
network approved by the corporation under this chapter; and
(2) will be located in a qualified data center. or is a part of a
quantum safe fiber network or is a part of a quantum computing
research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure
network.
SECTION 18. IC 6-2.5-15-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2025,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 17. A qualified data center user or a quantum
computing research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure
network operator is not entitled to the exemption provided by section
16 of this chapter unless the qualified data center user or the quantum
computing research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


network operator provides the seller with an exemption certificate on
a form prescribed by the department and a copy of the specific
transaction award certificate issued by the corporation. In the case of
utilities described in IC 6-2.5-4-5, the qualified data center user may
issue an exemption certificate on a form prescribed by the department
and a copy of the specific transaction award certificate issued by the
corporation to cover all utility purchases from that seller. However, for
the corporation to issue a specific transaction award certificate for
utilities described in IC 6-2.5-4-5, the qualified data center user must
agree to report and remit use tax under this article to the department on
the part of the utility purchases used for administration of the facility.
SECTION 19. IC 6-2.5-15-18, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2025,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 18. (a) This section does not apply to a
qualified data center user that is a qualified colocation tenant.
(a) (b) If the corporation determines that a qualified data center user
or a quantum computing research, advanced computing, and defense
infrastructure network operator that did not pay taxes as a result of the
award provided under this chapter and is not entitled to the award
because of the qualified data center user's noncompliance with the
requirements of the sales tax award certificate agreement or this
chapter, the corporation shall, after giving the qualified data center user
or the operator an opportunity to explain the noncompliance:
(1) notify the department of the noncompliance; and
(2) request the department to impose an assessment on the
qualified data center user or the quantum computing research,
advanced computing, and defense infrastructure network operator
in an amount that may not exceed the sum of the taxes not paid as
a result of the exemption provided under this chapter together
with interest and penalties required or permitted by law.
(b) (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of IC 6-8.1-5-2, an
assessment under subsection (a) (b) is considered timely if the
department issues a proposed assessment:
(1) not later than one hundred eighty (180) days from the date the
department is notified of the noncompliance; or
(2) the date on which a proposed assessment could otherwise be
issued in a timely manner under IC 6-8.1-5-2;
whichever is later.
SECTION 20. IC 6-2.5-15-19, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2025,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 19. Except as provided in section 18 of this
chapter, if the corporation approves a qualified data center user's or a
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


quantum computing research, advanced computing, and defense
infrastructure network operator's application to receive a specific
transaction award certificate and enters into an agreement with the
qualified data center user or the quantum computing research,
advanced computing, and defense infrastructure network operator for
a specific transaction award certificate, the corporation's certification
of the qualified data center or the quantum computing research,
advanced computing, and defense infrastructure network remains in
effect, even if there is a future transfer, sale, or disposition, directly or
indirectly, of the qualified data center. or the quantum computing
research, advanced computing, and defense infrastructure network. A
subsequent owner shall enter into an agreement with the corporation
before the subsequent owner is entitled to receive a specific transaction
award certificate for the remainder of the eligibility period.
SECTION 21. IC 6-2.5-15-20, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2025,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 20. Beginning in 2030, and every ten (10)
years thereafter, the corporation shall submit to the legislative council
in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6 an economic and fiscal impact
study evaluating the statewide impact of data center investments and
quantum computing research, advanced computing, and defense
infrastructure network investments in Indiana.
SECTION 22. IC 8-1-2-4.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4.9. (a) This section applies to a base rate
case:
(1) that is filed by an electricity supplier with the commission;
and
(2) with respect to which the commission has not issued a final
order before March 15, 2026;
regardless of when the base rate case is filed by the electricity
supplier with the commission.
(b) As used in this section, "electricity supplier" means a
person, however organized, that:
(1) provides retail electric service to customers in Indiana;
and
(2) is under the jurisdiction of the commission for the
approval of rates and charges.
(c) After March 14, 2026, the commission may not issue a final
order in a base rate case filed by an electricity supplier if the final
order, once fully implemented, would result in an average increase
of three percent (3%) or greater in the total monthly bill of a
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


residential customer of the electricity supplier.
SECTION 23. IC 8-1-2-86 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 86. (a) No Except
as provided in subsection (b), a license, permit, or franchise shall
may not be granted to any person, copartnership, or corporation to
own, operate, manage, or control any plant or equipment of any public
utility in any municipality where there is in operation a public utility
engaged in similar service under a license, franchise, or permit without
first securing from the commission a declaration, after a public hearing,
of all parties interested, that public convenience and necessity require
such second public utility.
(b) provided, that any A municipality, including a consolidated
city, may purchase, condemn, and operate, or construct and operate, a
utility in such municipality for the purpose of transportation,
production, transmission, delivery, sale, and furnishing of heat, light,
water, and/or or power to such the municipality and/or or the public
in and within six (6) miles of the limits of such the municipality,
without the consent of said the commission, although even if there is
operating in said the municipality a public utility engaged in a similar
service under a license, franchise, or indeterminate permit. A
certificate of public convenience and necessity is not required as a
condition precedent to:
(1) the owning, leasing, acquisition, construction, or operation
of a utility under this section; or
(2) the purchase or condemnation of a public utility's
property under section 92 or 93 of this chapter;
as set forth in IC 8-1.5-2-7.
(b) (c) Any permit, license, or franchise in existence on May 1,
1913, which shall contain contains any term whatsoever interfering
with the existence of a second public utility is hereby declared to be
against public policy and is hereby amended in such manner as to
permit a municipality to grant a license, franchise, or permit for the
operation of such a second public utility pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter.
SECTION 24. IC 8-1-2-95.1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 95.1. Except as
provided in IC 8-1.5-2-15.1, notwithstanding any other provision of
this chapter, after February 29, 1980, a municipality, public utility, or
corporation organized under IC 8-1-13 may not bring any action in the
circuit or superior court of any county against any corporation
organized under IC 8-1-13 or any public utility as defendant for the
condemnation of its electric utility property for the use of the property
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


in providing electric utility service.
SECTION 25. IC 8-1.5-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.34-2024,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) This chapter does not apply to utilities
governed by:
(1) IC 8-1-13; or
(2) IC 8-1-2 except for a municipally owned electric, natural gas,
water, wastewater, or combined water and wastewater utility.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in section 15.1 of this chapter,
the law relating to acquisition of electric utility property and to
electricity suppliers' service area assignments shall be is governed by
IC 8-1-2.3 and IC 8-1-2-95.1 and nothing in this chapter modifies or
abridges does not modify or abridge those provisions.
SECTION 26. IC 8-1.5-2-15.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 15.1. (a) This section applies
to a municipality that seeks to purchase the electric utility property
of a public utility for use of the property in providing electric
utility service.
(b) As used in this section, "public utility" has the meaning set
forth in IC 8-1-2-1(a).
(c) If a municipality and the owners of a public utility are
unable to agree upon a price to be paid for the electric utility
property of the public utility, the municipality may:
(1) by ordinance declare that a public necessity exists for the
condemnation of the electric utility property; and
(2) bring, in the circuit or superior court of the county where
the municipality is located, an action against the public utility
for the condemnation of the electric utility property.
(d) An ordinance adopted under subsection (c) is final.
(e) For the purpose of acquiring the electric utility property of
a public utility, the municipality:
(1) may exercise the power of eminent domain in accordance
with IC 32-24; and
(2) is required only to establish the necessity of taking as this
chapter requires.
SECTION 27. IC 8-1.5-3-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.161-2020,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8. (a) A municipality owning a utility under
this chapter shall furnish reasonably adequate services and facilities.
(b) The rates and charges made by a municipality for a service
rendered or to be rendered, either directly or in connection therewith,
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


must be nondiscriminatory, reasonable, and just.
(c) "Reasonable and just rates and charges for services" means rates
and charges that produce sufficient revenue to:
(1) pay all the legal and other necessary expenses incident to the
operation of the utility, including:
(A) maintenance costs;
(B) operating charges;
(C) upkeep;
(D) repairs;
(E) depreciation;
(F) interest charges on bonds or other obligations, including
leases; and
(G) costs associated with the acquisition of utility property
under IC 8-1.5-2;
(2) provide a sinking fund for the liquidation of bonds or other
obligations, including leases;
(3) provide a debt service reserve for bonds or other obligations,
including leases, in an amount established by the municipality,
not to exceed the maximum annual debt service on the bonds or
obligations or the maximum annual lease rentals;
(4) provide adequate money for working capital;
(5) provide adequate money for making extensions and
replacements to the extent not provided for through depreciation
in subdivision (1); and
(6) provide money for the payment of any taxes that may be
assessed against the utility.
(d) It is the intent of this section that the rates and charges produce
an income sufficient to maintain the utility property in a sound physical
and financial condition to render adequate and efficient service. Rates
and charges too low to meet these requirements are unlawful.
(e) This subsection does not apply to rates and charges
established or amended by a municipal legislative body after
March 14, 2026. The board may recommend to the municipal
legislative body rates and charges sufficient to include a reasonable
return on the utility plant of the municipality.
(f) Rates and charges established under this section are subject to
the approval of:
(1) the municipal legislative body by ordinance; and
(2) the commission, in accordance with the procedures set forth
in IC 8-1-2.
The commission shall approve rates and charges that are sufficient, in
addition to the cash revenue requirements set forth in subsection (c), to
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


include a reasonable return on the utility plant of the municipality if the
legislative body so elects. For rates and charges established or
amended by a municipal legislative body after March 14, 2026, the
commission may not approve rates and charges that include a
return on the utility plant of the municipality.
(g) Except for a municipally owned utility taxed under IC 6-1.1-8-3,
the commission shall approve rates and charges sufficient to
compensate the municipality for taxes that would be due the
municipality on the utility property were it privately owned. These rates
and charges in lieu of taxes may be transferred to the municipal general
fund, if the legislative body so elects.
(h) The commission shall grant a request that an increase in rates
and charges not be effective until after the occurrence of a future event
if the legislative body so requests.
(i) A municipality that acquires and operates a utility under
IC 8-1.5-2 by exercising the power of eminent domain may not impose
a special rate, charge, surcharge, or other fee, other than rates and
charges approved under this section or otherwise authorized by law, on
the customers of the utility in order to pay for the costs associated with
acquiring the utility through the exercise of the power of eminent
domain.
(j) This subsection does not apply to services rendered by a sewage
works that is subject to IC 36-9-23 or to IC 36-9-25. This subsection
also does not apply to services rendered by a department of public
utilities created by IC 8-1-11.1 or to services rendered by a utility
company owned, operated, or held in trust by a consolidated city. This
subsection applies to property that is served by a municipally owned
utility and that is occupied by someone other than the owner of the
property. Upon applying for utility service from a municipally owned
utility for property subject to this subsection, the person occupying the
property shall provide the municipally owned utility with the name and
contact information of the owner or manager of the property. Subject
to subsection (k), all rates, charges, and other fees for services rendered
by a municipally owned utility to a property that is subject to this
subsection are payable by the person occupying the property if the
account or other customer or billing records maintained by the
municipally owned utility for the property indicate that:
(1) the property is occupied by someone other than the owner; and
(2) the person occupying the property is responsible for paying
the rates, charges, and fees assessed for the services rendered by
the municipally owned utility with respect to the property.
Rates, charges, and fees assessed for services rendered by a
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


municipally owned utility with respect to property occupied by
someone other than the owner of the property do not constitute a lien
against the property.
(k) With respect to property that is served by a municipally owned
utility and that is occupied by someone other than the owner of the
property, subsection (j) does not:
(1) prohibit a municipal legislative body from imposing any:
(A) requirement for a deposit to ensure payment by the person
occupying the property of the rates, charges, and fees assessed
for the services rendered by the municipally owned utility with
respect to the property; or
(B) other requirement to ensure the creditworthiness of the
person occupying the property as the account holder or
customer with respect to the property;
that the municipal legislative body may lawfully impose; or
(2) abrogate or limit the authority of the owner of a multi-unit
building to engage in electrical submetering under IC 8-1-2-36.5,
subject to:
(A) the owner's qualification to engage in submetering under
IC 8-1-2-36.5 and 170 IAC 4-5; and
(B) the owner's compliance with the requirements for
submetering set forth in IC 8-1-2-36.5 and 170 IAC 4-5.
(l) With respect to property that is served by a municipally owned
utility and that is occupied by someone other than the owner of the
property, subsection (k) does not allow a municipal legislative body to
impose a requirement that the owner of the property must:
(1) ensure the creditworthiness of the person occupying the
property; or
(2) accept responsibility for charges incurred by the person
occupying the property;
by cosigning an agreement or by any other method.
SECTION 28. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) As used in this
SECTION, "commission" refers to the Indiana utility regulatory
commission created by IC 8-1-1-2.
(b) As used in this SECTION, "electricity supplier" means a
person, however organized, that:
(1) provides retail electric service to customers in Indiana;
and
(2) is under the jurisdiction of the commission for the
approval of rates and charges.
(c) The commission may not issue before July 1, 2028, a final
order in a base rate case filed by an electricity supplier with the
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120


commission, regardless of the date of filing of the electricity
supplier's base rate case with the commission.
(d) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
SECTION 29. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 83—LS 6380/DI 120